District of Columbia statutes.
31-5041.08

Underwriting contract required with title insurer.

A person acting in the capacity of a title insurance producer shall not place business with a title insurer unless there is in force a written contract between the parties which sets forth the responsibilities of each party, and, if both parties share responsibility for a particular function, specifies the division of the responsibilities.

Sept. 24, 2010, D.C. Law 18-223, § 2129, 57 DCR 6242
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 2129 of Fiscal Year 2011 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2010 (D.C. Act 18-463, July 2, 2010, 57 DCR 6542).